Utah statutes.
63M-1-3105.   Report to the legislative committees.

The office shall submit, before November 1, an annual written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee and the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee describing:

(1)  the office's success in attracting alternative energy manufacturing projects to the state and the resulting increase in new state revenues under this part;

(2)  the amount of tax credits the office has granted or will grant and the time period during which the tax credits have been or will be granted; and

(3)  the economic impact on the state by comparing new state revenues to tax credits that have been or will be granted under this part.



Amended by Chapter 255, 2013 General Session

